Nebraska, session 109, LB777.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB777 LB777
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-908 (1) The department shall administer the medical assistance
program.
(2) The department may (a) enter into contracts and interagency
agreements, (b) adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, (c) adopt fee
schedules, (d) apply for and implement waivers and managed care plans for
services for eligible recipients, including services under the Nebraska
Behavioral Health Services Act, and (e) perform such other activities as
necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties under the Medical
Assistance Act. A covered item or service as described in section 68-911
that is furnished through a school-based health center, furnished by a
provider, and furnished under a managed care plan pursuant to a waiver
does not require prior consultation or referral by a patient's primary
care physician to be covered. Any federally qualified health center
providing services as a sponsoring facility of a school-based health
center shall be reimbursed for such services provided at a school-based
health center at the federally qualified health center reimbursement
rate.
(3) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of information
regarding applicants for or recipients of medical assistance and such
information shall only be used for purposes related to administration of
the medical assistance program and the provision of such assistance or as
otherwise permitted by federal law.
(4) The department shall provide the maximum amount of retroactive
coverage for each medical assistance eligibility category as permitted by
federal law.
(5) (4) The department shall prepare an annual summary and analysis
of the medical assistance program for legislative and public review. The
department shall submit a report of such summary and analysis to the
Governor and the Legislature electronically no later than December 1 of
-2-

LB777 LB777
2026 2026
each year. The annual summary shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) The number and percentage of applications approved and denied;
(b) The number of eligibility determinations, including the number
and percentage of those individuals remaining enrolled, terminations, and
other determinations;
(c) The number of case closures in the medical assistance program
and the Children's Health Insurance Program and the specific reason for
the closure broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program
type, (ii) local public health district or other geographic area, and
(iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(d) The number of medical assistance program and Children's Health
Insurance Program enrollees broken down by (i) eligibility category,
including program type, (ii) local public health district or other
geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(e) The number and percentage of redeterminations or renewals
processed ex parte, broken down by (i) eligibility category, including
program type and (ii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(f) The average number of days required to process applications for
the medical assistance program and Children's Health Insurance Program,
separating the data by applicants with modified adjusted gross income and
nonmodified adjusted gross income eligibility;
(g) The rate of re-enrollment within ninety days of termination and
within twelve months of termination, broken down by (i) eligibility
category, including program type, (ii) local public health district or
other geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available;
(h) The average client call duration;
(i) The client call abandonment rate;
(j) The number of requests for a fair hearing separated by (i)
eligibility category and program type, (ii) outcome, and (iii) amount of
time until final disposition; and
(k) A link to the medical assistance program fair hearing decisions
-3-

LB777 LB777
2026 2026
that have been redacted to protect private and health information, which
shall be posted on the department's website; .
(l) The status of community engagement requirements, including:
(i) A description of the plans to implement community engagement
requirements for medicaid recipients, including the authority and
effective date for the requirements and the recipients subject to the
requirements;
(ii) The number of denied applications and renewals for failure to
meet community engagement requirements;
(iii) The number of applications and renewals denied because the
community engagement requirement verification could not be completed;
(iv) The number of applications and renewals which required the
recipient to submit additional information relating to compliance with
community engagement requirements;
(v) The number of applications and renewals approved because the
applications and renewals received an exemption, the type of exemption,
whether or not the exemption was applied automatically, and whether or
not the recipient was required to take action to receive the exemption;
(vi) The number of applications and renewals approved because the
applications and renewals complied with the community engagement
requirement, disaggregated by the compliance activity type, whether or
not compliance was determined automatically, and whether or not the
recipient was required to take further action in order to be approved;
(vii) The number of applications and renewals denied or terminated
due to a failure to meet community engagement requirements in which the
recipient was re-enrolled within ninety days and the number of such
applications and renewals in which the recipient was re-enrolled within
twelve months;
(viii) A list of data sources the department uses to verify
compliance or exemption status; and
(ix) A list of external vendors contracted by the state to assess
-4-

LB777 LB777
2026 2026
compliance with, or exemption from, community engagement requirements,
including a link to each vendor's current contract;
(m) The number of identified cases of concurrent enrollment and
external vendors contracted by the state to identify concurrent
enrollees, including a link to each vendor's contract. For cases
terminated for concurrent enrollment, the rate of re-enrollment within
ninety days after the date of termination and the rate of re-enrollment
within twelve months after the date of termination; and
(n) A description of cost sharing, premiums, copays, and deductibles
for goods and services provided under the medical assistance program,
including (i) the amounts of the cost sharing, premiums, copays, and
deductibles and (ii) the payment source for collected cost sharing.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-908, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-